Maine, session 132, LD1062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §395, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 675, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §395, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 675, §6, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
2. Transactions covered by this section. This section applies only to transactions in
which a dealer sells to a buyer at a gun show.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §395, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 675, §6, is amended to
read:
4. Requirement for transactions covered by this section. A seller who is not a
federally licensed firearms dealer may not complete a transaction to which this section
applies unless the seller facilitates the transaction through a federally licensed firearms
dealer. The dealer shall perform a background check of the putative buyer in a transaction
to which this section applies by using the Federal Bureau of Investigation, National Instant
Criminal Background Check System in the same manner as if the dealer were the seller of
the firearm that is the subject of the transaction. If the background check reveals that the
putative buyer is prohibited from purchasing a firearm, the dealer shall notify the seller of
that fact and of the fact that the transaction may not proceed. The dealer may charge a
reasonable fee for serving as the facilitator.